Utah statutes.
70D-3-201.   Licensing required -- Exemptions.

(1) (a)  On or after January 1, 2011, except as provided in Subsection (2), an individual described in Subsection (1)(b) may not engage in the business of a loan originator unless that individual:

(i)  is licensed under this chapter; or

(ii)  is a registered loan originator.

(b)  This Subsection (1) applies to an employee or agent of:

(i)  a depository institution;

(ii)  a subsidiary of a depository institution; or

(iii)  an affiliate of a depository institution.

(2)  An individual described in Subsection (1)(b) may engage in the business of a loan originator without being licensed under this chapter or a registered loan originator when acting as a loan processor or underwriter.

